test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h31_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: nummar
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: nummar
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: nummari
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: nummars
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: [nummur, nummar]
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: [nummur, nummar]
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: numrum
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: numra
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: nummarið
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: nummarið
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: [nummarinum, numrinum]
    nummar+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: nummarsins
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: [nummurini, nummarini, numrini]
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: [nummurini, nummarini, numrini]
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: numrunum
    nummar+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: numranna
